Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-482.01
Sale of game authorized.

Game lawfully acquired from the holder of a permit under sections 37-465 and 37-479 may be sold in this state. The burden of proof is upon the buyer, seller, or possessor to show by competent and satisfactory evidence that game in his or her possession or sold by him or her was lawfully acquired from such a permitholder.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 177;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 37-467;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 62.